North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-30.2 Myron G. Nelson Fund, Incorporated [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 107, § 15; S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]

10-30.2-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 107, § 15; S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]

10-30.2-02.
Public corporation established — Corporate purpose. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 107, § 15.

10-30.2-03.
Powers of corporation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 107, § 15.

10-30.2-04.
Capitalization — Payment of dividends. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 107, § 15.

10-30.2-05.
Board of directors. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 107, § 15.

10-30.2-06.
Professional investor to manage corporate funds — Investment policy. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 107, § 15.

10-30.2-07.
Confidentiality of records. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 107, § 15; S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]

10-30.2-08.
Guarantee of industrial revenue bonds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 107, § 15.

10-30.2-09.
Annual audit. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 107, § 15.

10-30.2-10.
Annual report. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 107, § 15.

10-30.2-11.
Tax credits for investment by financial institutions and insurance companies. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 107, § 15; S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]

10-30.2-12.
Income tax credits for investment. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 107, § 15; S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]

10-30.2-13.
Limitation on tax credits. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 107, § 15; S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]

10-30.2-13.1.
Investment reporting forms. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 107, § 15; S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]

10-30.2-13.2.
Tax credit procedure. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 107, § 15; S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]

10-30.2-14.
State and board of director immunity from liability. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 107, § 15; S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]

10-30.2-15.
Dissolution of corporation — Validation of acts and transfer of assets. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 107, § 15; S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]

10-30.2-16.
Final report. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 107, § 15; S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]